District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-614.05

Other rating procedures prohibited; exception.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1405, 25 DCR 5740
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 11-16, § 2(a), 42 DCR 1394
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(q), 45 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-615.5.
1973 Ed., § 1-344.5.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(q) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-614.01.